tr: Servisler > Çevresel Hizmetler: Atık Yönetimi Hizmetleri
ro-RO: Servicii > Servicii de mediu: Servicii de management al deșeurilor
es: Servicios > Servicios ambientales: Servicios de gestión de residuos
ko: 서비스 > 환경 서비스: 폐기물 관리 서비스
it: Servizi > Servizi ambientali: Servizi di gestione dei rifiuti
hr-HR: Usluge > Usluge vezane za zaštitu okoliša: Usluge gospodarenja otpadom
hu: Szolgáltatások > Környezetvédelmi szolgáltatások: Hulladékgazdálkodási szolgáltatások
zh-TW: 維修 > 環境服務: 廢棄物管理服務
de: Dienstleistungen > Umweltbezogene Dienstleistungen: Abfallwirtschaft
ja: サービス > 環境サービス: 不動産管理サービス
pl: Usługi > Usługi środowiskowe: Usługi gospodarki odpadami
lt-LT: Paslaugos > Aplinkosaugos paslaugos: Atliekų tvarkymo paslaugos
da: Service > Miljøtjenester: Affaldstjenester
ru: Услуги > Экологические услуги: Услуги управления отходами
pt-BR: Serviços > Serviços ambientais: Serviços de gestão de serviços
en: Services > Environmental Services: Waste Management Services
pt-PT: Serviços > Serviços ambientais: Serviços de gestão de resíduos
zh-CN: 服务 > 环境服务: 废弃物管理服务
sl-SI: Storitve > Okoljske storitve: Storitve ravnanja z odpadki
nb: Tjenester > Miljøtjenester: Avfallshåndteringstjenester
sv: Tjänster > Miljötjänster: Avfallshanteringstjänster
fi: Huollot > Ympäristöpalvelut: Jätehuoltopalvelut
sk-SK: Servis > Environmentálne služby: Služby odpadového hospodárstva
cs: Služby > Environmentální služby: Služby v oblasti nakládání s odpady
vi: Dịch vụ > Dịch vụ môi trường: Dịch vụ quản lý rác thải
bg-BG: Услуги > Екологични услуги: Услуги за управление на отпадъци
nl: Diensten > Milieudiensten: Afvalverwerkingsdiensten
th: บริการ > บริการด้านสิ่งแวดล้อม: บริการจัดการขยะ
fr: Services > Services environnementaux: Services de gestion des déchets
el: Υπηρεσίες > Περιβαλλοντικές υπηρεσίες: Υπηρεσίες διαχείρισης απορριμμάτων